District of Columbia statutes.
46-302.11

Continuing, exclusive jurisdiction to modify spousal-support order.

(a)

A tribunal of the District issuing a spousal-support order consistent with the law of the District has continuing, exclusive jurisdiction to modify the spousal-support order throughout the existence of the support obligation.

(b)

A tribunal of the District may not modify a spousal-support order issued by a tribunal of another state having continuing, exclusive jurisdiction over that order under the law of that state.

(c)

A tribunal of the District that has continuing, exclusive jurisdiction over a spousal-support order may serve as:

(1)

An initiating tribunal to request a tribunal of another state to enforce the spousal-support order issued in the District; or

(2)

A responding tribunal to enforce or modify its own spousal-support order.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 211
as added June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(b)(3)(E), 53 DCR 3634

Section References

This section is referenced in § 46-302.02.

Effective Dates

Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 211 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).